Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 20 Public Corporation Financial Integrity and Accountability

35-20-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Corporation Financial Integrity and Accountability Act of 1995.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 86, § 1.

35-20-2.
Policy.

The legislature hereby finds that:

Fraud and errors in public and quasi-public programs are more likely to occur from a lack of sufficient internal control structures in the state-authorized public corporations.

Effective internal control structures provide the basic foundation upon which public accountability must be built.

An entity’s system of internal control structures consists of policies and procedures designed to provide management with reasonable assurance that the agency achieves its objectives and goals including:

Reliability of financial reporting;

Compliance with applicable laws and regulations; and

Effectiveness and efficiency of operations.

Internal control structures are necessarily dynamic and must be continuously evaluated and, where necessary, improved.

Reports addressing the adequacy of the internal control structure of each public corporation are necessary to enable the executive branch, the legislature, and the public to evaluate the corporation’s performance of its public and quasi-public responsibilities and accountability.

The legislature declares that:

The management of each public corporation is responsible for establishing and maintaining an adequate internal control structure and policies and procedures for financial reporting.

Each public corporation shall perform an assessment and produce a report on the effectiveness of the internal control structure and procedures for financial reporting and, when detected, control weaknesses must be promptly corrected.

All levels of management of the public corporation must be involved in assessing and strengthening the systems of internal control structures to minimize fraud, errors, abuse, and waste of public and quasi-public funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 165, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 196, § 2.

35-20-3.
Corporation responsibilities.

The chairs and chief executive officers of public corporations are responsible for the establishment and maintenance of a system or systems of internal accounting and administrative control within their respective corporations. This responsibility includes documenting the system, communicating system requirements to employees, and assuring that the system is functioning as prescribed and is modified, as appropriate, for changes in conditions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 86, § 1.

35-20-4.
Internal accounting controls.

Internal accounting and administrative controls are the methods through which reasonable assurances can be given that measures adopted by public corporations to safeguard assets, check the accuracy and reliability of accounting data, promote operational efficiency, and encourage adherence to prescribed managerial policies are being followed. The elements of a satisfactory system of internal accounting and administrative control, shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

A plan of organization that provides segregation of duties appropriate for proper safeguarding of public corporation assets.

A plan that limits access to public corporation assets to authorized personnel who require these assets in the performance of their assigned duties.

A system of authorization and recordkeeping procedures adequate to provide effective accounting control over assets, liabilities, revenues, and expenditures.

An established system of practices to be followed in performance of duties and functions in each of the public corporations.

Personnel of a quality commensurate with their responsibilities.

An effective system of internal review.

Public corporations shall follow these standards of internal accounting and administrative control in carrying out the requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 86, § 1.

35-20-5.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Controller” means the state controller of Rhode Island.

“Director” means the director of administration.

“Governor” means the governor of Rhode Island.

“Public corporation” means any body corporate and politic created or to be created pursuant to statute, including, without limitation, the Rhode Island industrial recreational building authority, the Rhode Island economic development corporation and any subsidiaries thereof, the Rhode Island industrial facilities corporation, the Rhode Island refunding bond authority, the Rhode Island health and educational building authority, the board of governors for higher education, the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation, the Rhode Island public transit authority, the Rhode Island student loan authority, the water resources board corporate, the Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission, the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation, the Rhode Island depositors economic protection corporation, the Rhode Island convention center authority, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority, their successors and assigns. Cities, towns, and any corporation created by a city or town pursuant to statute, and fire and water districts, are not public corporations under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 86, § 1.

35-20-6.
Annual report.

To ensure that the requirements of this section are fully complied with, each public corporation shall prepare and submit a report on the adequacy of the corporation’s systems of internal accounting and administration control by December 31 of each year.

The report, including the state agency’s response to report recommendations, shall be signed by the chairperson and/or the chief executive officer of the corporation and addressed to the governor. Copies of the reports shall be forwarded to both houses of the legislature, the auditor general, and the director. Copies of these reports shall also be forwarded to the state library where they shall be available for public inspection.

By September 30, 1995, the director, in consultation with the auditor general and the controller, shall establish a system of reporting and a general framework to guide the public corporations in performing evaluations on their systems of internal accounting and administrative control. The director, in consultation with the auditor general and the controller, may modify the format for the report or the framework for conducting the evaluations from time to time as deemed necessary.

Any material inadequacy or material weakness in systems of internal accounting and administrative control which prevents the chair and/or chief executive officer of the corporation from stating that the systems of internal accounting and administrative control provided reasonable assurance that each of the objectives specified above was achieved shall be identified and the plans and schedule for correcting the inadequacy described in detail.

The annual report of each public corporation shall also include financial statements relating to the operation, properties, income, expenditure, assets, and liabilities, including outstanding bonded indebtedness, of the corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 86, § 1.

35-20-7.
Subsidiaries prohibited.

Except as expressly authorized by law, no public corporation shall have the right to exercise or perform any of its powers and functions through any subsidiary or any other separate corporation or entity. Except as expressly authorized by law, no public corporation shall direct, require, or permit any of its directors, officers, or employees to create any subsidiary organizations.

In any case in which a public corporation is expressly authorized by law to create or to act through a subsidiary or other separate corporation or entity, no such subsidiary or other separate corporation or entity shall have the power to issue bonds, notes or other securities without the authorization of the legislature. In accordance herewith, university heights housing corporation for the purpose of financing and/or rehabilitating university heights and RIH equity corporation for the purpose of financing investments in low-income housing tax credit eligible properties, which are subsidiaries of Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation are specifically authorized to issue debt for their corporate purposes. Provided, however, that nothing herein shall prohibit a wholly owned subsidiary of a public corporation from issuing notes or other evidences of indebtedness where the only payee or obligee on the instruments is the subsidiary’s parent public corporation; and provided further, however, that nothing herein shall prohibit a wholly owned subsidiary of a public corporation from issuing notes or other evidences of indebtedness in connection with its purchase or lease of business equipment or other personal property used by the subsidiary in the ordinary course of its usual and regular business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 86, § 1.

35-20-8.
Financial estimates for public corporations.

Itemized estimates of the financial needs of each public corporation shall be submitted by each chairperson or chief executive officer of a public corporation to the governor through the budget officer of the department of administration. The budget officer shall also provide copies of the estimates to the house fiscal advisor and the senate fiscal advisor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 14, § 1.

35-20-9.
Financial Estimates for Public Corporations.

Itemized estimates of the financial needs of each public corporation shall be submitted by each chairperson or chief executive officer of a public corporation to the governor through the budget officer of the department of administration. The estimate shall be in such form, and in such number of copies, and with such explanation as the budget officer may require. The budget officer shall also provide copies of the estimates to the house fiscal advisor and the senate fiscal advisor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 295, § 1.

35-20-10.
Personal use of public corporation credit cards prohibited.

It is unlawful for any employee of a public corporation, as defined in §

35-20-5(4)

, or his or her designee, to use or permit others to use corporation issued credit cards for personal use.

For purposes of this section, “Personal use” means any use the purpose of which is for personal enjoyment, private gain or advantage, or an outside endeavor not related to the business of the public corporation.

Any person who violates this section is liable for a civil penalty equal to three times the value of the unlawful use plus an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The penalty shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the state of Rhode Island by the attorney general. If two (2) or more persons are responsible for any violation, they are jointly and severally liable for the penalty. If the action is brought by the attorney general, the moneys recovered shall be paid into the general fund. Nothing in this section prevents the attorney general from pursuing criminal charges against any person who violates this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 313, § 1.

35-20-11.
Policies and procedures for credit card use — Payment for food and beverages.

The executive officers of any public corporation shall establish and implement policies and procedures regarding the use of corporation issued credit cards and the payment for food and beverages. The policies and procedures shall be consistent with the provisions of §

35-20-10

and the policies and procedures established by the state director of administration contained in the procedural handbook issued by the department of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 313, § 1.